Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.2212] DEATH CERTIFICATE; IMMUNIZATION RECORD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Documentation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall include on each death certificate the dates and types of immunization administered within the two years preceding the person's death. The death certificate immunization record must document vaccination event data elements that must include: new text end new text begin (1) vaccination administration date; new text end new text begin (2) vaccine dose volume; new text end new text begin (3) vaccine dose volume units; new text end new text begin (4) vaccine expiration date; new text end new text begin (5) vaccine lot number; new text end new text begin (6) vaccine product name; new text end new text begin (7) vaccine route of administration; and new text end new text begin (8) vaccine site of administration. new text end new text begin The state registrar shall enter on the decedent's state death record at the time the death certificate is certified all vaccination event data elements in paragraph (b) through and including two years prior to the date of death. new text end new text begin (b) For children under eighteen years of age, the entire immunization record text must be placed into a text field attached to the decedent's death certificate. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Immunization death reports. new text end new text begin (a) Within ten days of the beginning of the state fiscal year, the commissioner of health shall produce a report, available to the public, on the total deaths that occurred within 24 hours, three days, one week, three weeks, ten weeks, 25 weeks, and one year of immunization, including subtotals of type of vaccine, gender, age group, race, ethnicity, and comorbidity type, if available. new text end new text begin (b) Within 30 days after the end of the state fiscal year, the commissioner of health shall produce a report and make the report available to the public. The report shall include the prior five years of the same data specified in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Cause of death and injury study. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health shall conduct a biennial cause of death and injury study and issue a public report within two weeks of the date that is one year before each general presidential election and each general midterm or gubernatorial election. The report shall include: new text end new text begin (1) deaths involving cause of or contributing condition to death; new text end new text begin (2) injuries involving anything that appears in a physician's notes for the patient; and new text end new text begin (3) demographic data that includes race, age, gender, occupation, and other data as appropriate and that is not a violation of privacy. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Independent audit of reports. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall select four public health audit proposals biennially from a person or organization not affiliated or dependent upon any governmental entity, pharmaceutical industry ecosystem entity, or public official. The selected auditor or auditors shall be required to sign a nondisclosure agreement to protect the privacy of individuals that the data represents, conduct themselves in accordance with state and federal privacy laws, and share the auditors' findings with the commissioner at least two days prior to any public disclosure of the findings, unless injury or death might occur within those two days. new text end new text begin (b) Prior to the engagement of the auditors, the commissioner shall determine and agree upon the format of the data files to be shared with the auditors. new text end new text begin (c) The auditors' proposal must meet minimum standards of competence in data management, aggregation, depiction, and presentation as a result of the work to be done. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to deaths occurring on or after January 1, 2026. new text end